Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB173.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 105. Veteran of Korean Armed Forces.(a) Eligibility.-- Any resident of this Commonwealth who is an eligible veteran of the Korean Armed Forces and , a duly naturalized citizen of the United States AND HAS BEEN RECOGNIZED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS UNDER 38 U.S.C. § 109 (RELATING TO BENEFITS FOR DISCHARGED MEMBERS OF ALLIED FORCES) shall be afforded the same rights, benefits, recognition and privileges as afforded to veterans of the Pennsylvania military forces.(b) Proof of service.--Any appropriate Commonwealth agency <--<--1234567891011121314151617 or department may request supporting documentation to determine that an individual applying for benefits or recognition is an eligible veteran of the Korean Armed Forces. A request may include discharge or separation papers or other documents of proof to establish military service AND DOCUMENTS FROM THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . (c) Definition.--The term "eligible veteran of the Korean Armed Forces" shall mean any member of the Republic of Korea Armed Forces who served on active duty in the Vietnam War between January 9, 1962, and May 7, 1975, and received an honorable discharge or equivalent discharge from military service. HAS BEEN RECOGNIZED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS UNDER 38 U.S.C. § 109.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0173PN0181 - 2 - <--<--<--1234567891011121314